Hawaii statutes.
§708-813 Criminal trespass in the first
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of criminal trespass in the
first degree if:

(a) That person knowingly enters or remains
unlawfully:

(i) In a dwelling; or

(ii) In or upon the premises of a hotel or apartment
building;

(b) That person:

(i) Knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in
or upon premises that are fenced or enclosed in a manner designed to exclude
intruders; and

(ii) Is in possession of a firearm, as defined
in section 134-1, at the time of the intrusion; or

(c) That person enters or remains unlawfully in or
upon the premises of any public school as defined in section 302A-101, or any
private school, after reasonable warning or request to leave by school
authorities or a police officer; provided however, such warning or request to
leave shall be unnecessary between 10:00 p.m. and 5:00 a.m.

(2) Subsection (1) shall not apply to a
process server who enters or remains in or upon the land or premises of
another, unless the land or premises are secured with a fence and locked gate,
for the purpose of making a good faith attempt to perform their legal duties
and to serve process upon any of the following:

(a) An owner or occupant of the land or premises;

(b) An agent of the owner or occupant of the land or
premises; or

(c) A lessee of the land or premises.

(3) As used in this section, "process
server" means any person authorized under the Hawaii rules of civil
procedure, district court rules of civil procedure, Hawaii family court rules,
or section 353C-10 to serve process.

(4) Criminal trespass in the first degree is a
misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 55, §1; am L 1975, c 32, §1;
am L 1981, c 177, §1; am L 1996, c 89, §18; am L 2000, c 200, §1; am L 2015, c
101, §2]

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §§708-813 TO 708-815

Act 101, Session Laws 2015, amended §§708-813 and 708-814 to
shield process servers performing their duties from prosecution under criminal
trespass statutes when they enter premises that are not secured by a fence or a
locked gate. The legislature found that process servers are an important part
of the judicial process. Act 101 allowed process servers to enter or remain in
or upon the premises of another for the purpose of making a good faith attempt
to serve process upon certain individuals. Senate Standing Committee Report
No. 1363, Conference Committee Report No. 22.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next